Illinois, session 104th, HB3850.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-378 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-378 new)8    Sec. 2105-378. Continuing education; simulation training.9    (a) As used in this Section, "health care professional" 10means a person licensed or registered by the Department under 11the following Acts: the Medical Practice Act of 1987; the 12Nurse Practice Act; the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 131987; or the Registered Surgical Assistant and Registered 14Surgical Technologist Title Protection Act.15    (b) Simulation training by an approved sponsor as 16specified in a health care professional's licensing Act or 17applicable administrative rules shall be acceptable for the 18purposes of earning continuing education credit.